Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.290

Marked crosswalk.

"Marked crosswalk" means any portion of a roadway distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface thereof.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.290. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 30; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]